Utah statutes.
75-3-701.   Time of accrual of duties and powers.
The duties and powers of a personal representative commence upon his
appointment. The powers of a personal representative relate back in time to
give acts by the person appointed which are beneficial to the estate occurring
prior to appointment the same effect as those occurring thereafter. Prior to
appointment, a person named executor in a will may carry out written
instructions of the decedent relating to his body, funeral, and burial
arrangements. A personal representative may ratify and accept acts on behalf
of the estate done by others where the acts would have been proper for a
personal representative.
